Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1407
Grand jury; duties.

After the charge of the court, the grand jury shall retire with the officer appointed to attend to them, and shall proceed to inquire of and present all offenses whatever committed within the limits of the county in and for which they were impaneled and sworn or affirmed.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 398, p. 814;

R.S.1913, § 9037;

C.S.1922, § 10061;

C.S.1929, § 29-1407;

Laws 1939, c. 18, § 20, p. 111;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 29-1407;

R.S.1943, § 29-1407;

Laws 1959, c. 118, § 4, p. 450;

Laws 1979, LB 524, § 2.

"All offenses" embrace misdemeanors. Nelson v. State, 115 Neb. 26, 211 N.W. 175 (1926).